Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Civil Service System in Certain Other Municipalities

§ 21-31-51.
Adoption of civil service system mandated in certain municipalities.

There is hereby created a civil service commission to administer a civil service system in every municipality described in subsection (2) of this section which has administrative and other employees employed on a monthly basis.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall apply to:

Any municipality, operating under a commission form of government, and having a population of more than twenty-one thousand, according to the federal census of 1950; and

Any municipality located in the Yazoo-Mississippi Delta Levee District, and having a population of more than fifteen thousand and less than twenty thousand, according to the federal census of 1950.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825-30; Laws, 1944, ch. 209, § 1; Laws, 1952, ch. 368; Laws, 1960, ch. 430.

§ 21-31-53.
Appointment and removal, qualifications, and term of office of commissioners.

The members of the civil service commission shall be appointed by the city commission, shall be three (3) in number, and shall serve without compensation; however, the governing authority of any municipality having a population of not less than one hundred thousand (100,000) according to the federal census of 1960 may, in its discretion, pay each of the members of said commission a sum not to exceed Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) per month to compensate them for their services, and the governing authorities of any other municipality, in their discretion, may pay each of the members of the commission a sum not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per month to compensate them for their services. No person shall be appointed a member of such commission who is not a citizen of the United States, a resident of such city for at least five (5) years immediately preceding such appointment, and an elector of the county wherein he resides. The terms of office of such commissioners shall be for six (6) years, except that the first three (3) members shall be appointed for different terms as follows: one (1) to serve a period of two (2) years, one (1) to serve a period of four (4) years, and one (1) to serve a period of six (6) years.

From and after May 18, 1988, the effective date of Chapter 535, 1988 Regular Session, the governing authorities of any municipality organized under the provisions of Chapter 8, Title 21, Mississippi Code of 1972, in which a civil service commission is created pursuant to Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75, may increase the members of the commission to the same number of wards into which the municipality is divided and, if the commission is so expanded, the governing authorities shall appoint one (1) member of the commission from each ward. The commissioners shall serve without compensation; however, the governing authority of any municipality having a population of not less than one hundred thousand (100,000) according to the federal census of 1960 may, in its discretion, pay each of the members of the commission a sum not to exceed Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) per month to compensate them for their services, and the governing authorities of any other municipality, in their discretion, may pay each of the members of the commission a sum not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per month to compensate them for their services. No person shall be appointed a member of such commission who is not a citizen of the United States, a resident of the municipality for at least five (5) years immediately preceding such appointment, and an elector of the county wherein he resides. When making initial appointments under this paragraph (b), the governing authorities may stagger the terms of such appointees provided that no initial appointment is made for a period of less than one (1) year nor more than six (6) years; thereafter, all appointments shall be for terms of six (6) years. Appointment of members of the commission by the governing authorities under this paragraph (b) shall be made by the mayor with the confirmation of an affirmative vote of a majority of the city council present and voting at any meeting.

From and after July 1, 1994, the governing authorities of any municipality described in Section 21-31-51(2)(b), in which a civil service commission is created pursuant to Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75, may increase the membership of the commission to five (5), with one (1) member appointed by the governing authorities from each ward and one (1) appointed from the municipality at large. The governing authorities of the municipality may, in their discretion, pay each of the members of the commission a sum not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per month. No person shall be appointed a member of such commission who is not a citizen of the United States, a resident of the municipality for at least five (5) years immediately preceding such appointment, and an elector of the county wherein he resides. When making initial appointments under this paragraph (c), the governing authorities may stagger the terms of such appointees provided that no initial appointment is made for a period of less than one (1) year nor more than six (6) years; thereafter, all appointments shall be for terms of six (6) years.

Any member of such commission may be removed from office for incompetency, incompatibility, dereliction of duty or other good cause, by the appointing power. However, no member shall be removed until charges have been preferred in writing and a full hearing before the appointing power. Any member being removed shall have the right of appeal, any time within thirty (30) days thereafter, to the circuit court and may demand a jury; such trial shall be confined to the determination of whether the order of removal made by the appointing power was, or was not, made in good faith and for cause.

A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825-31; Laws, 1944, ch. 209 § 1; Laws, 1964, ch. 507, § 2; Laws, 1973, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 361; Laws, 1988, ch. 535, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 549, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 21-31-55.
Election of officers and meetings of commission; secretary; board of examiners.

Immediately after the appointment of the civil service commission, the commission shall organize by electing one of its members chairman. The commission shall hold regular meetings at least once each month, and such additional meetings as may be required for the proper discharge of its duties.

The commission shall appoint a secretary and a board of examiners, which board shall consist of the fire chief, the police chief, and a third member to be named by the commission, all of whom shall serve without compensation. The secretary shall keep the records and preserve all reports made to the commission, and also a record of all examinations held under the direction of the board of examiners, and perform such other duties as the commission may prescribe. The members of the board and the secretary are subject to suspension and discharge in the same manner as the commissioners.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825-34; Laws, 1944, ch. 209, § 4.

§ 21-31-57.
Duties of the commission.

It shall be the duty of the civil service commission to make suitable rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75 and not inconsistent with personnel rules and regulations duly adopted by the governing authorities of the municipality. Such rules and regulations shall provide in detail the manner of conducting examinations, appointments, promotions, transfers, reinstatements, demotions, suspensions and discharges, and may also provide for any other matter connected with the general subject of personnel administration, and which may be considered desirable to further carry out the general purposes of Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75. It shall have the power to conduct investigations, and make reports on all matters touching the enforcement and effect of the provisions of Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75, and the rules and regulations prescribed hereunder. The commission shall have the power to investigate all complaints which must be reduced to writing, subpoena witnesses, administer oaths and conduct hearings.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825-35; Laws, 1944, ch. 209, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 549, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 21-31-59.
Accommodations, supplies and clerical aid to be furnished to commission.

The duly constituted authorities of each and every city coming within the purview of Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75, shall provide the commission with suitable and convenient rooms and accommodations and cause the same to be furnished, heated and lighted and supplied with all office supplies and equipment necessary to carry on the business of the commission and with such clerical assistance as may be necessary, all of which is to be commensurate with the number of persons in each such city coming within the purview of Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75. The failure upon the part of the duly constituted authorities to do so, shall be considered a violation of this section and shall be punishable as such.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825-43; Laws, 1944, ch. 209, § 13.

§ 21-31-61.
Coverage afforded by civil service system.

The provisions of Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75 shall include all administrative and other employees on a monthly salary basis. All appointments to and promotions in said departments shall be made solely on merit, efficiency and fitness which may be ascertained by open competitive examination and impartial investigation. No person shall be reinstated in, or transferred, suspended or discharged from, any place, position or employment contrary to the provisions of Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75.

All incumbents and future appointees shall be subject to civil service, except, however, those appointees now and hereafter serving as extra members, which employees shall be subject to removal for replacement by any person now or hereafter serving in the armed services; or, if temporarily employed, the commission shall have authority to so determine and replace with a new employee who shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75.

The provisions of Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75 shall not include any new employee who has not successfully completed all requirements necessary to earn regular or permanent status as a municipal employee.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3825-32, 3825-33; Laws, 1944, ch. 209, §§ 2, 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 549, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 21-31-63.
Qualifications of applicants seeking civil service position.

Any applicant for a position of any kind under civil service must be a citizen of the United States and an elector of the county in which he resides and must meet only such bona fide occupational residency requirements as may be determined by the civil service commission or the governing authority of the municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825-38; Laws, 1944, ch. 209 § 8; Laws, 1994, ch. 549, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 21-31-65.
Adoption and induction of incumbents into civil service.

For the benefit of the public service and to prevent delay, injury, or interruption therein by reason of the enactment of Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75, all persons holding a position as an administrative or other employee (firemen and policemen excepted) of any such municipality coming under the provisions of Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75, who shall have served continuously in such positions for a period of at least the preceding six months, are hereby declared eligible for permanent appointment under civil service to the offices, positions or employments which they shall then hold, respectively, without examination or other act on their part, and not on probation, and every such person is hereby automatically adopted and inducted permanently into civil service, into such office, place, position or employment which such person then holds as completely and effectually to all intents and purposes as if said person had been permanently appointed thereto under civil service after examination and investigation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825-37; Laws, 1944, ch. 209, § 7.

§ 21-31-67.
Appointments and lay-offs.

The civil service commission shall keep a list of all administrative and other employees on a monthly salary basis (firemen and policemen excepted), and formulate methods of determining the relative qualifications of persons seeking employment in any such department, and give preference to those having the best qualifications. The commission shall provide that men laid off because of a curtailment of expenditures, reduction in force, and like causes, shall be the last man or men, including probationers, that have been appointed to any such position, until such reductions necessary shall have been accomplished. However, in the event said forces shall again be increased in number, those suspended shall be reinstated before any new appointments shall be made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825-36; Laws, 1944, ch. 209, § 6.

§ 21-31-69.
Tenure of office and grounds for discipline.

The tenure of everyone holding an office, place, position or employment under the provisions of Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75 shall be only during good behavior. Any such person may be removed or discharged, suspended without pay, demoted or reduced in rank, or deprived of vacation privileges or other special privileges, or any combination thereof, for any of the following reasons:

Incompetency, inefficiency or inattention of duty; dishonesty, intemperance, immoral conduct, insubordination, discourteous treatment of the public or a fellow employee; or any other act of omission or commission tending to injure the public service.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825-39; Laws, 1944, ch. 209, § 9; Laws, 1984, ch. 521, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 21-31-71.
Removal, suspension, demotion, and discharge.

No person in the classified civil service who shall have been permanently appointed or inducted into civil service under the provisions of Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75 shall be removed, suspended, demoted or discharged, or any combination thereof, except for cause, and only upon the written accusation of the appointing power or any citizen or taxpayer, a written statement of which accusation, in general terms, shall be served upon the accused, and a duplicate filed with the commission. The mayor may suspend a member pending the confirmation of the suspension by the regular appointing power, which shall be within three (3) days.

In the absence of extraordinary circumstances or situations, before any such employee may be removed or discharged, he shall be given written notice of the intended termination, which notice shall state the reasons for termination and inform the employee that he has the right to respond in writing to the reasons given for termination within a reasonable time and respond orally before the official charged with the responsibility of making the termination decision. Such official may, in his discretion, provide for a pretermination hearing and examination of witnesses, and if a hearing is to be held, the notice to the employee shall also set the time and place of such hearing. A duplicate of such notice shall be filed with the commission. After the employee has responded or has failed to respond within a reasonable time, the official charged with the responsibility of making the termination decision shall determine the appropriate disciplinary action, and shall notify the employee of his decision in writing at the earliest practicable date.

Where there are extraordinary circumstances or situations which require the immediate discharge or removal of an employee, such employee may be terminated without a pretermination hearing as required by this section, but such employee shall be given written notice of the specific reasons for termination within twenty-four (24) hours after the termination, and shall be given an opportunity for a hearing similar to the pretermination hearing provided in this section within twenty (20) days after the date of termination. For the purposes of this section, extraordinary situations or circumstances include, but are not limited to, circumstances where retention of the employee would result in damage to municipal property, would be detrimental to the interest of municipal government or would result in injury to the employee, to a fellow employee or to the general public.

Any person so removed, suspended, demoted, discharged or combination thereof may, within ten (10) days from the time of such disciplinary action, file with the commission a written demand for an investigation, whereupon the commission shall conduct such investigation. The investigation shall be confined to the determination of the question of whether such disciplinary action was or was not made for political or religious reasons and was or was not made in good faith for cause. After such investigation the commission may, if in its estimation the evidence is conclusive, affirm the disciplinary action, or if it shall find that the disciplinary action was made for political or religious reasons, or was not made in good faith for cause, shall order the immediate reinstatement or reemployment of such person in the office, place, position or employment from which such person was removed, suspended, demoted, discharged or combination thereof, which reinstatement shall, if the commission so provides in its discretion, be retroactive, and entitle such person to pay or compensation from the time of such disciplinary action. The commission upon such investigation may, in lieu of affirming the disciplinary action, modify the order of removal, suspension, demotion, discharge or combination thereof by directing a suspension, without pay, for a given period and subsequent restoration of duty, or by directing a demotion in classification, grade or pay, or by any combination thereof. The findings of the commission shall be certified in writing to the appointing power, and shall be forthwith enforced by such officer.

All investigations made by the commission pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be by public hearing, after reasonable written notice to the accused of the time and place of such hearing, at which hearing the accused shall be afforded an opportunity of appearing in person and by counsel, and presenting his defense. The findings of the commission shall be conclusive and binding unless either the accused or the municipality shall, within thirty (30) days from the date of the entry of such judgment or order on the minutes of the commission and notification to the accused and the municipality, appeal to the circuit court of the county within which the municipality is located. Any appeal of the judgment or order of the commission shall not act as a supersedeas of such judgment or order, but the judgment or order shall remain in effect pending a final determination of the matter on appeal. Such appeal shall be taken by serving the commission and the appellee, within thirty (30) days after the entry of such judgment or order, a written notice of appeal, stating the grounds thereof, and demanding that a certified transcript of the record and of all papers on file in the office of the commission affecting or relating to such judgment or order, be filed by the commission with such court. The commission shall, within thirty (30) days after the filing of such notice, make, certify and file such transcript with such court. The said circuit court shall thereupon proceed to hear and determine such appeal. However, such hearing shall be confined to the determination of whether the judgment or order of removal, discharge, demotion, suspension or combination thereof made by the commission, was or was not made in good faith for cause, and no appeal to such court shall be taken except upon such ground or grounds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825-40; Laws, 1944, ch. 209, § 10; Laws, 1984, ch. 521, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 21-31-73.
Fixing of rate of compensation.

The fixing of the rate of compensation of every employee coming under the provisions of Sections 21-31-51 through 21-31-75 shall remain vested in those public officials authorized by law to fix the rate of such compensation, and nothing contained in said sections shall infringe upon the power and authority of any such public officials to so fix the rate of such compensation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825-41; Laws, 1944, ch. 209, § 11.

§ 21-31-75.
Political services and contributions.

No person holding any office, place, position or employment subject to civil service, is under any obligation to contribute to any political fund or to render any political service to any person or party whatsoever, and no person shall be removed, reduced in grade or salary, or otherwise prejudiced for refusing so to do. No public officer, whether elected or appointed, shall discharge, promote, demote or in any manner change the official rank, employment or compensation of any person under civil service, or promise or threaten so to do, for giving or withholding, or neglecting to make any contribution of money, or service, or any other valuable thing, for any political purpose. No such employee shall engage in any political campaign as a representative of any candidate or shall engage in pernicious activities, and any person so engaging in such activities shall be subject to dismissal or demotion.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3825-42; Laws, 1944, ch. 209, § 12.